Utah, session 2026, SB315.
Section 1. Section 59-7-625 is amended to read:59-7-625. Nonrefundable tax credit for a donation to the Carson Smith Opportunity Scholarship Program.(1)A taxpayer that makes a donation to the Carson Smith Opportunity Scholarship Program established in Section 53E-7-402 may claim a nonrefundable tax credit equal to 100%any portion of the amount stated on a tax credit certificate issued in accordance with Section 53E-7-407.(2)If theany amount of a tax credit listed on the tax credit certificate exceeds a taxpayer's liability under this chapteris unclaimed for a taxable year, the taxpayer:(a)may carry forward the unclaimed amount of the tax credit exceeding the liability for a period that does not exceed the next three taxable years; and(b)may carry back the unclaimed amount of the tax credit that exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability to the previous taxable year.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 59-10-1041 is amended to read:59-10-1041. Nonrefundable tax credit for a donation to the Carson Smith Opportunity Scholarship Program.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a claimant, estate, or trust that makes a donation to the Carson Smith Opportunity Scholarship Program established in Section 53E-7-402 may claim a nonrefundable tax credit equal to 100%any portion of the amount stated on a tax credit certificate issued in accordance with Section 53E-7-407.(2)If theany amount of a tax credit listed on the tax credit certificate exceeds a claimant's, estate's, or trust's tax liability under this chapter is unclaimed for a taxable year, the claimant, estate, or trust:(a)may carry forward the unclaimed amount of the tax credit exceeding the liability for a period that does not exceed the next three taxable years; and(b)may carry back the unclaimed amount of the tax credit that exceeds the claimant's, estate's, or trust's tax liability to the previous taxable year.(3)A claimant, estate, or trust may not claim a credit described in Subsection (1) to the extent the claimant, estate, or trust claims a donation described in Subsection (1) as an itemized deduction on the claimant's, estate's, or trust's federal individual income tax return for that taxable year.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Retrospective operation.This bill has retrospective operation for a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026.